Louisiana, session 2026, HB134.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2717.2.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2717.2.1. Display or delivery of material harmful to minors
A. For purposes of this Section, the following terms apply:
(1) "Account", "interactive computer service", and "minor" have the same
meanings as provided in R.S. 9:2717.2.
(2) "Material harmful to minors" has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
51:2121.
B. An interactive computer service that enters into a contract with a minor,
including the creation of an online account, shall not deliver or display to a minor
account material harmful to minors that was created or developed, in whole or in
part, by the interactive computer service.
C.(1) Any interactive computer service that violates the provisions of this
Section shall be subject to a civil fine of up to ten thousand dollars per violation set
and enforced by the attorney general by filing a civil enforcement action in a court
of competent jurisdiction.
(2)(a) Prior to filing a civil enforcement action, the attorney general shall
provide the interactive computer service with a written notice that identifies each
alleged violation and an explanation of the basis for each allegation.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 134 ENROLLED
(b) The interactive computer service may cure the alleged violations by
providing the attorney general with a written statement, within forty-five days of
receipt of the notice provided pursuant to Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph,
indicating that the violation is cured and no further violations will occur.
(c) Except as provided in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection, the attorney
general shall not file a civil enforcement action if the interactive computer service
timely cures the alleged violations as provided by Subparagraph (b) of this
Paragraph.
(3) The attorney general may file a civil enforcement action against an
interactive computer service that does either of the following:
(a) Fails to cure a violation after receiving the written notice described in
Subparagraph (2)(a) of this Subsection.
(b) Commits another violation after receiving the written notice described
in Subparagraph (2)(a) of this Subsection.
(4) If a court of competent jurisdiction grants judgment or injunctive relief
to the attorney general, the court shall award the attorney general reasonable attorney
fees, court costs, and investigative costs.
D. All monies received from the payment of a fine or civil penalty imposed
and collected pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall be used by the attorney
general for consumer protection efforts or to promote consumer protection and
education.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.